Florida, session 2026, SB1256.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 31 32 Section 1.âSection 624.491, Florida Statutes, is amended to 33 read: 34 624.491âPharmacy audits; enforcement; penalties; 35 rulemaking.â 36 (1)âA pharmacy benefits plan or program as defined in s. 37 626.8825 providing pharmacy benefits must comply with the 38 requirements of this section when the pharmacy benefits plan or 39 program or any person or entity acting on behalf of the pharmacy 40 benefits plan or program, including, but not limited to, a 41 pharmacy benefit manager as defined in s. 626.88, audits the 42 records of a pharmacy licensed under chapter 465. The person or 43 entity conducting such audit must: 44 (a)âApply uniform audit standards, scope, frequency, and 45 penalty practices to all pharmacies within the pharmacy benefits 46 planâs or programâs network, including pharmacy benefit manager 47 owned or -affiliated pharmacies and nonaffiliated pharmacies. 48 (b)âNot impose stricter audit methodologies, higher error 49 thresholds, expanded documentation requirements, or more 50 frequent audits on nonaffiliated pharmacies than on pharmacy 51 benefit manager-owned or -affiliated pharmacies. 52 (c)âUpon request by the office or a network pharmacy 53 subject to audit, provide documentation demonstrating compliance 54 with paragraph (a) or paragraph (b), including a comparison of 55 audit frequency, scope, methodologies, and recoupment rates 56 between pharmacy benefit manager-owned or -affiliated pharmacies 57 and nonaffiliated pharmacies. 58 (d)(a)âExcept as provided in subsection (5) (3), notify the 59 pharmacy in writing at least 30 7 calendar days before any the 60 initial onsite or remote audit for each audit cycle. 61 (e)(b)âNot schedule an onsite audit during the first 7 3 62 calendar days of a month unless the pharmacist consents in 63 writing otherwise. 64 (f)âNot disrupt patient care or otherwise interfere with 65 the pharmacyâs daily operations. 66 (g)(c)âLimit the duration of the audit period to 24 months 67 after the date a claim is submitted to or adjudicated by the 68 entity. 69 (h)âLimit each audit to a random sampling of no more than 70 0.1 percent of prescriptions. Additional claims may be audited 71 only if fraud, waste, or abuse is reasonably suspected and 72 stated in writing. 73 (i)âUse a random selection process for conducting audits. 74 Targeted selection based on drug class, cost, or therapeutic 75 category is prohibited unless fraud, waste, or abuse is 76 reasonably suspected and stated in writing. 77 (j)(d)âIn the case of an audit that requires clinical or 78 professional judgment, conduct the audit in consultation with, 79 or allow the audit to be conducted by, a pharmacist licensed in 80 this state. 81 (k)(e)âAllow the pharmacy to use the written and verifiable 82 records of a prescriber, hospital, physician, or other 83 authorized practitioner, which are transmitted by any means of 84 communication, to validate the pharmacy records in accordance 85 with state and federal law. Electronic records and scanned 86 prescriptions are valid. 87 (l)(f)âReimburse the pharmacy for a claim that was 88 retroactively denied for a clerical error, typographical error, 89 scrivenerâs error, or computer error or for an omission or 90 discrepancy in documentation which does not affect the identity 91 of the patient, the identity of the prescriber, the drug 92 dispensed, the quantity dispensed, the date of service, or the 93 accuracy of the amount paid under the claim, if the prescription 94 was properly and correctly dispensed, unless a pattern of such 95 errors exists, fraudulent billing is alleged, or the error 96 results in actual financial loss to the entity. Such errors are 97 not considered fraud unless there is clear and convincing 98 evidence of intent to defraud. 99 (m)(g)âProvide the pharmacy with a copy of the preliminary 100 audit report within 30 120 days after the conclusion of the 101 audit. 102 (n)(h)âAllow the pharmacy to produce documentation to 103 address a discrepancy or audit finding, or to initiate an 104 appeal, within 30 10 business days after the preliminary audit 105 report is delivered to the pharmacy. A written audit appeals 106 process is required. 107 (o)(i)âProvide the pharmacy and the plan sponsor with a 108 copy of the final audit report within 90 days 6 months after the 109 pharmacyâs receipt of the preliminary audit report. 110 (p)(j)âCalculate any recoupment or penalties based on 111 actual overpayments. Recoupment may and not be calculated 112 according to the accounting practice of extrapolation unless 113 agreed upon in writing as part of a settlement. Recoupment is 114 limited to the dispensing fee unless the pharmacy failed to 115 dispense the drug or acted with willful intent to defraud. 116 Ingredient cost recoupment is prohibited unless fraud or willful 117 misrepresentation is proven. All recouped funds must be returned 118 in full to the plan sponsor. Recoupment may not occur until: 119 l.âThe pharmacy has had at least 30 days to respond; 120 2.âAll appeals are resolved; and 121 3.âA final audit report is issued. 122 (q)âNot be compensated based on recovery amounts. 123 (2)âThe person or entity conducting such audit may not: 124 (a)âDisregard valid inventory acquired in accordance with 125 state and federal law and legitimate business practices. All 126 legally sourced products held by the pharmacy at the time of 127 dispensing must count toward inventory reconciliation. 128 (b)âImpose additional notification or approval requirements 129 for routine pharmacy business decisions. 130 (c)âRequire sourcing from a narrower list of distributors 131 than what is permitted under state or federal licensure 132 standards. 133 (d)âImpose manufacturer-driven restrictions on the source 134 of drug products used in audit reconciliation. 135 (e)âReject purchases from pharmacy-to-pharmacy transfers 136 conducted in accordance with state and federal law and 137 accompanied by appropriate transaction documentation. 138 (f)âRequire bank statements, deposit records, including 139 copies of the front or back of checks, and point-of-sale 140 transaction records, or a combination of such records if any one 141 or more of these records sufficiently demonstrates copay 142 collection consistent with industry norms. Reasonable proof of 143 copay collection shall be limited to standard pharmacy records, 144 including signature logs, point-of-sale transaction records, and 145 accounting records. 146 (g)âRequire subsequent attestations from the patient. Lack 147 of subsequent attestation may not be used to justify claim 148 reversal or recoupment if a pharmacy possesses valid 149 documentation that medication was dispensed to the patient or 150 his or her authorized representative, including, but not limited 151 to, signature logs, electronic dispensing records, point-of-sale 152 transaction records, or an in-person pharmacist acknowledgement 153 of dispensing. 154 (h)âInitiate subsequent attestations more than 180 days 155 after the date of service. 156 (i)âRequire duplicate or extraordinary documentation beyond 157 what is required under state and federal law in invoice audits. 158 The following is deemed sufficient proof of lawful acquisition 159 of products for audit reconciliation purposes: 160 1.âInvoices from licensed wholesalers or distributors. 161 2.âValid documentation of pharmacy-to-pharmacy transfers 162 conducted in accordance with state or federal law. 163 3.âRecords consistent with the Drug Supply Chain Security 164 Act, 21 U.S.C. ss. 351 et seq., and Board of Pharmacy 165 requirements. 166 167 Documentation may not be required unless reasonably necessary to 168 validate lawful inventory acquisitions. 169 (3)(a)âAn audit designated as a fraud, waste, or abuse 170 audit must be based on specific, documented evidence or a 171 credible allegation of fraud, waste, or abuse involving the 172 pharmacy or a specific claim or set of claims under review. 173 (b)âThe person or entity conducting a fraud, waste, or 174 abuse audit must provide the pharmacy with, in writing, before 175 commencement of such audit: 176 1.âA clear statement that the audit is designated as a 177 fraud, waste, or abuse audit. 178 2.âA list of the specific facts, data, or allegations 179 forming the basis for the fraud, waste, or abuse designation. 180 3.âIdentification of the specific claims or classes of 181 claims to which the fraud, waste, or abuse designation applies. 182 (c)âA person or entity auditing the records of a pharmacy 183 licensed under chapter 465 may not use a fraud, waste, or abuse 184 audit designation to circumvent any provision of this section 185 unless the audit complies fully with this subsection. 186 (4)(2)âThis section does not apply to: 187 (a)âAudits conducted by the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit or 188 initiated under a criminal investigation supported by probable 189 cause; 190 (b)(a)âAudits in which suspected fraudulent activity or 191 other intentional or willful misrepresentation is evidenced by a 192 physical review, review of claims data or statements, or other 193 investigative methods; 194 (c)(b)âAudits of claims paid for by federally funded 195 programs; or 196 (d)(c)âConcurrent reviews or desk audits that occur within 197 3 business days after transmission of a claim and where no 198 chargeback or recoupment is demanded. 199 (5)(3)âAn entity that audits a pharmacy located within a 200 Health Care Fraud Prevention and Enforcement Action Team (HEAT) 201 Task Force area designated by the United States Department of 202 Health and Human Services and the United States Department of 203 Justice may dispense with the notice requirements of paragraph 204 (1)(d) (1)(a) if such pharmacy has been a member of a 205 credentialed provider network for less than 12 months. 206 (6)(4)âPursuant to s. 408.7057, and after receipt of the 207 final audit report issued under paragraph (1)(o) (1)(i), a 208 pharmacy may appeal the findings of the final audit report as to 209 whether a claim payment is due and as to the amount of a claim 210 payment. 211 (7)(5)âA pharmacy benefits plan or program that, under 212 terms of a contract, transfers to a pharmacy benefit manager the 213 obligation to pay a pharmacy licensed under chapter 465 for any 214 pharmacy benefit claims arising from services provided to or for 215 the benefit of an insured or subscriber remains responsible for 216 a violation of this section. 217 (8)âThe office shall enforce this section and may: 218 (a)âInvestigate complaints of violations of this section. 219 (b)âIssue cease and desist orders. 220 (c)âImpose administrative fines as follows: 221 1.âFor misuse of the fraud, waste, or abuse designation in 222 violation of subsection (3), a fine not to exceed $100,000 per 223 violation. 224 2.âFor a violation of paragraph (1)(a), paragraph (1)(b), 225 or paragraph (1)(c), a fine not to exceed $50,000 per violation. 226 3.âFor any other violation of this section, a fine not to 227 exceed $25,000 per violation. 228 (d)âOrder restitution for improper recoupments. 229 (e)âProhibit any person or entity from conducting audits 230 under this section for up to 2 years upon a finding that such 231 person or entity has committed willful abuse of the fraud, 232 waste, or abuse designation in violation of subsection (3). 233 (f)âSuspend or revoke a pharmacy benefit managerâs 234 registration under s. 624.490 for repeated or willful 235 violations. 236 (9)âThe commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement 237 this section. 238 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.